Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2314
Referral, defined.

Referral means a process whereby a nurse practitioner directs the patient to a physician or other health care practitioner for management of a particular problem or aspect of the patient's care.

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 24;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 40;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 55;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1716.05;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 806.